Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-121
Court action.

(a) A court of competent jurisdiction in this state may hear and resolve a matter involving the administration of an assignment or the exercise of an assignee's powers and duties, including a request for instructions or approval or to declare rights.

(b) Without limiting the rights of the assignee or a creditor or other interested person to request the court to hear or resolve a matter under subsection (a) of this section, on request of the assignee, the court may issue an order relating to the administration of the assignment or the exercise of the assignee's powers and duties, including an order for disposition of an asset or the incurrence of an obligation.

(c) Acceptance of the assignment by the assignee constitutes the assignee's consent to the jurisdiction of the court.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 21.
July 18, 2026